North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 3. Labor of Prisoners.
§ 148-40.
Recapture of escaped prisoners. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The rules and regulations for the government of the State prison system may provide for the recapture of convicts that may escape, or any convicts that may have escaped from the State’s prison or prison camps, or county road camps of this State, and the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction may pay to any person recapturing an escaped convict such reward or expense of recapture as the regulations may provide. Any citizen of North Carolina shall have authority to apprehend any convict who may escape before the expiration of the convict’s term of imprisonment whether the convict be guilty of a felony or misdemeanor, and retain the convict in custody and deliver the convict to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 21; 1955, c. 238, s. 8; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(cccccccc); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(hhhh).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-40

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(hhhh), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(cccccccc), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(hhhh), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the first and last sentences; and, in the last sentence, substituted “the convict’s term” for “his term”, substituted “the convict be” for “he be” and substituted “the convict to” for “him to.” For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 148-41.
Recapture of escaping prisoners; reward. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Secretary of Public Safety shall use every means possible to recapture, regardless of expense, any prisoners escaping from or leaving without permission any of the State prisons, camps, or farms. When any person who has been confined or placed to work escapes from the State prison system, the Secretary shall immediately notify the Governor, and accompany the notice with a full description of the escaped prisoner, together with such information as will aid in the recapture. The Governor may offer such rewards as he may deem desirable and necessary for the recapture and return to the State prison system of any person who may escape or who heretofore has escaped therefrom. Such reward earned shall be paid by warrant of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and accounted for as a part of the expense of maintaining the State’s prisons.

History.

1873-4, c. 158, s. 13; Code, s. 3442; Rev., s. 5407; 1917, c. 236; c. 286, s. 13; C. S., ss. 7742, 7743; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1935, c. 414, s. 16; 1943, c. 409; 1955, c. 238, s. 9; c. 279, s. 3; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, ss. 13, 15; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(dddddddd).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(dddddddd), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the last sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” in the first sentence and substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the last sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-41.
Recapture of escaping prisoners; reward. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall use every means possible to recapture, regardless of expense, any prisoners escaping from or leaving without permission any of the State prisons, camps, or farms. When any person who has been confined or placed to work escapes from the State prison system, the Secretary shall immediately notify the Governor, and accompany the notice with a full description of the escaped prisoner, together with such information as will aid in the recapture. The Governor may offer such rewards as he may deem desirable and necessary for the recapture and return to the State prison system of any person who may escape or who heretofore has escaped therefrom. Such reward earned shall be paid by warrant of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and accounted for as a part of the expense of maintaining the State’s prisons.

History.

1873-4, c. 158, s. 13; Code, s. 3442; Rev., s. 5407; 1917, c. 236; c. 286, s. 13; C. S., ss. 7742, 7743; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1935, c. 414, s. 16; 1943, c. 409; 1955, c. 238, s. 9; c. 279, s. 3; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, ss. 13, 15; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(dddddddd); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(dddddddd), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the last sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” in the first sentence and substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the last sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-42.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 711, s. 33.

§ 148-43.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1963, c. 1174, s. 5.

§ 148-44.
Separation as to sex.

The Department shall provide quarters for female prisoners separate from those for male prisoners.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 25; 1947, c. 262, s. 2; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1963, c. 1174, s. 2; 1985, c. 226, s. 3(3).

§ 148-45.
Escaping or attempting escape from State prison system; failure of conditionally and temporarily released prisoners and certain youthful offenders to return to custody of Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Any person in the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety in any of the classifications hereinafter set forth who shall escape from the State prison system, shall for the first such offense, except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor:

A prisoner serving a sentence imposed upon conviction of a misdemeanor;

A person who has been charged with a misdemeanor and who has been committed to the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety under the provisions of

G.S. 162-39

;

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 226, s. 4.

A person who shall have been convicted of a misdemeanor and who shall have been committed to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for presentence diagnostic study under the provisions of G.S. 15A-1332(c).

Any person in the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, in any of the classifications hereinafter set forth, who shall escape from the State prison system, shall, except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, be punished as a Class H felon:

A prisoner serving a sentence imposed upon conviction of a felony;

A person who has been charged with a felony and who has been committed to the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety under the provisions of

G.S. 162-39

;

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 226, s. 5.

A person who shall have been convicted of a felony and who shall have been committed to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for presentence diagnostic study under the provisions of G.S. 15A-1332(c); or

Any person previously convicted of escaping or attempting to escape from the State prison system.

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 760, s. 5.

Any person who aids or assists other persons to escape or attempt to escape from the State prison system shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 465, s. 5.

Any person convicted of an escape or attempt to escape classified as a felony by this section shall be immediately classified and treated as a convicted felon even if such person has time remaining to be served in the State prison system on a sentence or sentences imposed upon conviction of a misdemeanor or misdemeanors.

Any person convicted and in the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and ordered or otherwise assigned to work under the work-release program,

G.S. 148-33.1

, or any convicted person in the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and temporarily allowed to leave a place of confinement by the Secretary of Public Safety or his designee or other authority of law, who shall fail to return to the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, shall be guilty of the crime of escape and subject to the applicable provisions of this section and shall be deemed an escapee. For the purpose of this subsection, escape is defined to include, but is not restricted to, willful failure to return to an appointed place and at an appointed time as ordered.

If a person, who would otherwise be guilty of a first violation of G.S. 148-45(g)(1), voluntarily returns to his place of confinement within 24 hours of the time at which he was ordered to return, such person shall not be charged with an escape as provided in this section but shall be subject to such administrative action as may be deemed appropriate for an escapee by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety; said escapee shall not be allowed to be placed on work release for a four-month period or for the balance of his term if less than four months; provided, however, that if such person commits a subsequent violation of this section then such person shall be charged with that offense and, if convicted, punished under the provisions of this section.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 26; 1955, c. 279, s. 2; 1963, c. 681; 1965, c. 283; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1973, c. 1120; c. 1262, s. 10; 1975, cc. 170, 241, 705; c. 770, ss. 1, 2; 1977, c. 732, ss. 3, 4; c. 745; 1979, c. 760, s. 5; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1316, s. 47; 1981, c. 63, s. 1; c. 179, s. 14; 1983, c. 465, ss. 1-5; 1985, c. 226, ss. 3(4)-6; 1993, c. 539, ss. 1058, 1321, 1322; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-443, s. 19.25(t); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(eeeeeeee).

§ 148-45.
Escaping or attempting escape from State prison system; failure of conditionally and temporarily released prisoners and certain youthful offenders to return to custody of Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Any person in the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction in any of the classifications hereinafter set forth who shall escape from the State prison system, shall for the first such offense, except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor:

A prisoner serving a sentence imposed upon conviction of a misdemeanor;

A person who has been charged with a misdemeanor and who has been committed to the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction under the provisions of

G.S. 162-39

;

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 226, s. 4.

A person who shall have been convicted of a misdemeanor and who shall have been committed to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction for presentence diagnostic study under the provisions of G.S. 15A-1332(c).

Any person in the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, in any of the classifications hereinafter set forth, who shall escape from the State prison system, shall, except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, be punished as a Class H felon:

A prisoner serving a sentence imposed upon conviction of a felony;

A person who has been charged with a felony and who has been committed to the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction under the provisions of

G.S. 162-39

;

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 226, s. 5.

A person who shall have been convicted of a felony and who shall have been committed to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction for presentence diagnostic study under the provisions of G.S. 15A-1332(c); or

Any person previously convicted of escaping or attempting to escape from the State prison system.

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 760, s. 5.

Any person who aids or assists other persons to escape or attempt to escape from the State prison system shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 465, s. 5.

Any person convicted of an escape or attempt to escape classified as a felony by this section shall be immediately classified and treated as a convicted felon even if such person has time remaining to be served in the State prison system on a sentence or sentences imposed upon conviction of a misdemeanor or misdemeanors.

Any person convicted and in the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and ordered or otherwise assigned to work under the work-release program,

G.S. 148-33.1

, or any convicted person in the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and temporarily allowed to leave a place of confinement by the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction or his designee or other authority of law, who shall fail to return to the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, shall be guilty of the crime of escape and subject to the applicable provisions of this section and shall be deemed an escapee. For the purpose of this subsection, escape is defined to include, but is not restricted to, willful failure to return to an appointed place and at an appointed time as ordered.

If a person, who would otherwise be guilty of a first violation of G.S. 148-45(g)(1), voluntarily returns to his place of confinement within 24 hours of the time at which he was ordered to return, such person shall not be charged with an escape as provided in this section but shall be subject to such administrative action as may be deemed appropriate for an escapee by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction; said escapee shall not be allowed to be placed on work release for a four-month period or for the balance of his term if less than four months; provided, however, that if such person commits a subsequent violation of this section then such person shall be charged with that offense and, if convicted, punished under the provisions of this section.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 26; 1955, c. 279, s. 2; 1963, c. 681; 1965, c. 283; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1973, c. 1120; c. 1262, s. 10; 1975, cc. 170, 241, 705; c. 770, ss. 1, 2; 1977, c. 732, ss. 3, 4; c. 745; 1979, c. 760, s. 5; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1316, s. 47; 1981, c. 63, s. 1; c. 179, s. 14; 1983, c. 465, ss. 1-5; 1985, c. 226, ss. 3(4)-6; 1993, c. 539, ss. 1058, 1321, 1322; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-443, s. 19.25(t); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(eeeeeeee); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

§ 148-46.
Degree of protection against violence allowed. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

When any prisoner, or several combined shall offer violence to any officer, overseer, or correctional officer, or to any fellow prisoner, or attempt to do any injury to the prison building, or to any workshop, or other equipment, or shall attempt to escape, or shall resist, or disobey any lawful command, the officer, overseer, or correctional officer shall use any means necessary to defend himself, or to enforce the observance of discipline, or to secure the person of the offender, and to prevent an escape.

A misdemeanor prisoner classified and treated as a convicted felon as the result of a consecutive felony sentence or sentences, or a convicted felon placed in the custody of the Secretary of Public Safety pending the outcome of an appeal, or a defendant charged with a felony or felonies and placed in the custody of the Secretary of Public Safety pending trial, shall be considered as a convicted felon in the custody of the Secretary of Public Safety against whom any means reasonably necessary, including deadly force, may be used to prevent an escape.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 27; 1975, c. 230; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i); 2016-77, s. 8(d).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-77, s. 8(d), effective July 1, 2016, substituted “correctional officer” for “guard” twice in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” three times in subsection (b). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on use of deadly force in preventing escape of fleeing minor felon, see 34 N.C.L. Rev. 122 (1955).

§ 148-46.
Degree of protection against violence allowed. [Effective January 1, 2023]

When any prisoner, or several combined shall offer violence to any officer, overseer, or correctional officer, or to any fellow prisoner, or attempt to do any injury to the prison building, or to any workshop, or other equipment, or shall attempt to escape, or shall resist, or disobey any lawful command, the officer, overseer, or correctional officer shall use any means necessary to defend himself, or to enforce the observance of discipline, or to secure the person of the offender, and to prevent an escape.

A misdemeanor prisoner classified and treated as a convicted felon as the result of a consecutive felony sentence or sentences, or a convicted felon placed in the custody of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction pending the outcome of an appeal, or a defendant charged with a felony or felonies and placed in the custody of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction pending trial, shall be considered as a convicted felon in the custody of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction against whom any means reasonably necessary, including deadly force, may be used to prevent an escape.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 27; 1975, c. 230; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i); 2016-77, s. 8(d); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-77, s. 8(d), effective July 1, 2016, substituted “correctional officer” for “guard” twice in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” three times in subsection (b). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on use of deadly force in preventing escape of fleeing minor felon, see 34 N.C.L. Rev. 122 (1955).

§ 148-46.1.
Inflicting or assisting in infliction of self injury to prisoner resulting in incapacity to perform assigned duties. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Any person serving a sentence or sentences within the State prison system who, during the term of such imprisonment, willfully and intentionally inflicts upon himself any injury resulting in a permanent or temporary incapacity to perform work or duties assigned to him by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, or any prisoner who aids or abets any other prisoner in the commission of such offense, shall be punished as a Class H felon.

History.

1959, c. 1197; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1979, c. 760, s. 5; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1316, s. 47; 1981, c. 63, s. 1; c. 179, s. 14; 1993, c. 539, s. 1323; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-443, s. 19.25(v); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(ffffffff).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-46.1

.

Cross References.

As to procedure for treatment of self-inflicted injuries upon prisoners where consent is refused, see

G.S. 148-46.2

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(ffffffff), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the middle of this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-46.1.
Inflicting or assisting in infliction of self injury to prisoner resulting in incapacity to perform assigned duties. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Any person serving a sentence or sentences within the State prison system who, during the term of such imprisonment, willfully and intentionally inflicts upon himself any injury resulting in a permanent or temporary incapacity to perform work or duties assigned to him by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, or any prisoner who aids or abets any other prisoner in the commission of such offense, shall be punished as a Class H felon.

History.

1959, c. 1197; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1979, c. 760, s. 5; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1316, s. 47; 1981, c. 63, s. 1; c. 179, s. 14; 1993, c. 539, s. 1323; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-443, s. 19.25(v); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(ffffffff); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-46.1

.

Cross References.

As to procedure for treatment of self-inflicted injuries upon prisoners where consent is refused, see

G.S. 148-46.2

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(ffffffff), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the middle of this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-46.2.
Procedure when consent is refused by prisoner. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

When the Secretary of Public Safety finds as a fact that the injury to any prisoner was willfully and intentionally self-inflicted and that an operation or treatment is necessary for the preservation or restoration of the health of the prisoner and that the prisoner is competent to act for himself or herself; and that attempts have been made to obtain consent for the proposed operation or treatment but such consent was refused, and the findings have been reduced to writing and entered into the prisoner’s records as a permanent part thereof, then the chief medical officer of the prison hospital or prison institution shall be authorized to give or withhold, on behalf of the prisoner, consent to the operation or treatment.

In all cases coming under the provisions of this section, the medical staff of the hospital or institution shall keep a careful and complete medical record of the treatment and surgical procedures undertaken. The record shall be signed by the chief medical officer of the hospital or institution and the surgeon performing any surgery. Any treatment of self-inflicted injuries shall also be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 90-21.13

and G.S.
90-21.16.

History.

1959, c. 1196; 1967, c. 996, s. 15; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1981, c. 307, ss. 4-7, 9; 2004-203, s. 53(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(i).

§ 148-46.2.
Procedure when consent is refused by prisoner. [Effective January 1, 2023]

When the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction finds as a fact that the injury to any prisoner was willfully and intentionally self-inflicted and that an operation or treatment is necessary for the preservation or restoration of the health of the prisoner and that the prisoner is competent to act for himself or herself; and that attempts have been made to obtain consent for the proposed operation or treatment but such consent was refused, and the findings have been reduced to writing and entered into the prisoner’s records as a permanent part thereof, then the chief medical officer of the prison hospital or prison institution shall be authorized to give or withhold, on behalf of the prisoner, consent to the operation or treatment.

In all cases coming under the provisions of this section, the medical staff of the hospital or institution shall keep a careful and complete medical record of the treatment and surgical procedures undertaken. The record shall be signed by the chief medical officer of the hospital or institution and the surgeon performing any surgery. Any treatment of self-inflicted injuries shall also be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 90-21.13

and G.S.
90-21.16.

History.

1959, c. 1196; 1967, c. 996, s. 15; 1969, c. 982; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 1981, c. 307, ss. 4-7, 9; 2004-203, s. 53(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(i); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o).

§ 148-47.
Disposition of child born of female prisoner.

Any child born of a female prisoner while she is in custody shall as soon as practicable be surrendered to the director of social services of the county wherein the child was born upon a proper order of the domestic relations court or juvenile court of said county affecting the custody of said child. When it appears to be for the best interest of the child, the court may place custody beyond the geographical bounds of Wake County: Provided, however, that all subsequent proceedings and orders affecting custody of said child shall be within the jurisdiction of the proper court of the county where the infant is residing at the time such proceeding is commenced or such order is sought: Provided, further, that nothing in this section shall affect the right of the mother to consent to the adoption of her child nor shall the right of the mother to place her child with the legal father or other suitable relative be affected by the provisions of this section.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 28; 1955, c. 1027; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 982.

§ 148-48.
Parole powers of Parole Commission unaffected.

Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to limit or restrict the power of the Parole Commission to parole prisoners under such conditions as it may impose or prevent the reimprisonment of such prisoners upon violation of the conditions of such parole, as now provided by law.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 29; 1955, c. 867, s. 8; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10.

§ 148-49.
Prison indebtedness not assumed by Board of Transportation.

The Board of Transportation shall not assume or pay off any part of the deficit of the State prison existing on March 22, 1933.

History.

1933, c. 172, s. 33; 1973, c. 507, s. 5.